California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(d) Not discoverable or admissible in any disciplinary proceeding without the written consent of the attorney to whom the information pertains.

(e) Except with respect to the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 6232, the limitations on the disclosure and admissibility of information in this section shall not apply to information relating to an attorney’s noncooperation with, or unsuccessful completion of, the Attorney Diversion and Assistance Program, or any subcommittee or agent thereof, or to information otherwise obtained by the Office of the Chief Trial Counsel, by independent means, or from any other lawful source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 23.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6235.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), participants in the Attorney Diversion and Assistance Program shall be responsible for all expenses relating to treatment and recovery.

(2) Consistent with subdivision (b), funds collected pursuant to Section 6140.9 for the Attorney Diversion and Assistance Program may be used for treatment and recovery services for participants who demonstrate an inability to pay. The State Bar shall develop rules or guidelines to implement this paragraph.

(3) In addition, the State Bar may charge a reasonable administrative fee to participants for the purpose of offsetting the costs of maintaining the
 program.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) or (3) of subdivision (a), the State Bar shall establish a program to provide financial assistance to licensees and persons eligible for services who otherwise would be denied acceptance into the program solely due to the lack of ability to pay.

(2) The funding for financial assistance shall be drawn exclusively from the ten-dollar ($10) fee paid by each active licensee under Section 6140.9 to support the Attorney Diversion and Assistance Program.

(3) Notwithstanding the goal of providing financial assistance pursuant to paragraph (1), the amount of funding allocated for the purpose of providing financial assistance shall not be allowed to compromise the financial needs of effectively administering the Attorney Diversion and Assistance
 Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 143.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6236.

The State Bar shall actively engage in outreach activities to make licensees, the legal community, and the general public aware of the existence and availability of the Attorney Diversion and Assistance Program. Outreach shall include, but not be limited to, the development and certification of minimum continuing legal education courses relating to behavioral health issues and the prevention, detection, and treatment of substance abuse, including no-cost and low-cost programs and materials pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 6070, informing all licensees of the State Bar of the program’s existence and benefits through both direct communication and targeted advertising, working in coordination with the judicial branch to inform the state’s judges of the
 program’s existence and availability as a disciplinary option, and working in cooperation with organizations that provide services and support to attorneys with issues related to behavioral health or substance abuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 419, Sec. 13.   (AB 2958)   Effective September 18, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6237.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the authorization of an Attorney Diversion and Assistance Program not be construed as limiting or altering the powers of the Supreme Court of this state to disbar or discipline licensees of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 145.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Attorneys Providing Immigration Reform Act Services [6240. - 6243.]

6240.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Immigration reform act” means either of the following:

(1) Any pending or future act of Congress that is enacted after October 5, 2013, that authorizes an undocumented immigrant who entered the United States without inspection, who did not depart after the expiration of a nonimmigrant visa, or who stayed beyond an authorized period, to attain a lawful status under federal law or to otherwise remain in the country. The State Bar shall announce and post on its Internet Web site when an immigration reform act has been enacted.

(2) The President’s
 executive actions on immigration announced on November 20, 2014, or any future executive action or order that authorizes an undocumented immigrant who entered the United States without inspection, who did not depart after the expiration of a nonimmigrant visa, or who stayed beyond an approved period pursuant to a visa, to attain a lawful status under federal law or to otherwise remain in the country. The State Bar shall announce and post on its Internet Web site when an executive action or order has been issued. 

(b) (1) “Immigration reform act services” means services offered in connection with an immigration reform act that are exclusively for the purpose of preparing an application and other related initial processes in order for an undocumented immigrant, who entered the United States without inspection, who did not depart after the expiration of a nonimmigrant visa, or who stayed beyond an
 approved period pursuant to a visa, to attain a lawful status under federal law or to otherwise remain in the country.

(2) Immigration reform act services do not include services that have an independent value apart from the preparation of an application pursuant to an immigration reform act and other related initial processes, including, but not limited to, assisting a client in preventing removal from the United States, preventing any other adverse action related to the ability to remain in the United States, including pending legal action, and achieving postconviction relief from prior criminal convictions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   (AB 60)   Effective June 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6241.

This article shall apply to the following:

(a) An attorney who is an active licensee of the State Bar who provides immigration reform act services.

(b) An attorney who is not an active licensee of the State Bar, but who meets both of the following:

(1) The attorney is authorized by federal law to practice law and to represent persons before the Board of Immigration Appeals or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

(2) The attorney is providing immigration reform act services in an office or business in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 146.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6242.

(a) It is unlawful for an attorney to demand or accept the advance payment of any funds from a person for immigration reform act services in connection with any of the following:

(1) An immigration reform act as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 6240, before the enactment of that act, when the relevant form or application is released or announced and is not subject to any pending legal action, or when the acceptance date of the relevant form or application has been announced, whichever is sooner.

(2) (A) Requests for expanded Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) under an immigration reform act as defined in
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6240, before the date the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services begins accepting those requests.

(B) Requests for Deferred Action for Parents of Americans and Lawful Permanent Residents (DAPA) under an immigration reform act as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6240, before the date the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services begins accepting those requests.

(C) Any relief offered under any executive action announced or executive order issued, on or after the effective date of the act adding this subparagraph, that authorizes an undocumented immigrant who either entered the United States without inspection or who did not depart after the expiration of a nonimmigrant visa to attain a lawful status under federal law, before the executive action or order has been implemented and the relief is
 available.

(b) Any advance payment of funds for immigration reform act services that was received after October 5, 2013, but before the enactment or implementation of the immigration reform act for which the services were sought, shall be refunded to the client promptly, but no later than 30 days after the receipt of the funds or placed into a client trust account, which must be returned or utilized under the provisions of the act amending this subdivision no later than January 20, 2017.

(c) (1) If an attorney providing immigration reform act services accepted funds for immigration reform act services prior to the effective date of this amendment to this section, and the services to be performed in connection with payment of those funds were rendered, the attorney shall promptly, but no later than 30 days after the effective date of this amendment to this
 section, provide the client with a statement of accounting describing the services rendered.

(2) (A) Any funds received before the effective date of this amendment to this section for which immigration reform act services were not rendered prior to the effective date of this amendment to this section shall be either refunded to the client or deposited in a client trust account.

(B) If an attorney deposits funds in a client trust account pursuant to this paragraph, he or she shall provide a written notice, in both English and the client’s native language, informing the client of the following:

(i) That there are no benefits or relief available, and that no application for such benefits or relief may be processed, until enactment or implementation of an immigration reform act and the related
 necessary federal regulations or forms, and that, commencing with the effective date of this amendment to this section, it is unlawful for an attorney to demand or accept the advance payment of any funds from a person for immigration reform act services before the enactment or implementation of an immigration reform act.

(ii) That he or she may report complaints to the Executive Office for Immigration Review of the United States Department of Justice, to the State Bar of California, or to the bar of the court of any state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States or of the District of Columbia where the attorney is admitted to practice law. The notice shall include the toll-free telephone numbers and Internet Web sites of those entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 6, Sec. 2.   (AB 60)   Effective June 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6243.

(a) (1) When a contract for legal services is required in writing pursuant to Section 6148, or is subject to Section 1632 of the Civil Code, an attorney providing immigration reform act services shall provide a written notice informing the client that he or she may report complaints to the Executive Office for Immigration Review of the United States Department of Justice, to the State Bar of California, or to the bar of the court of any state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States or of the District of Columbia where the attorney is admitted to practice law. The notice shall include the toll-free telephone numbers and Internet Web sites of those entities.

(2) The notice shall be in English and in one of the languages of the forms translated by the State Bar pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), if the contract for immigration reform act services was negotiated in one of those languages.

(3) The notice shall be attached or incorporated into any written contract for immigration reform act services. If the notice is attached to a written contract, it shall be signed by both the attorney and the client.

(b) (1) The State Bar shall provide the form of the notice required in subdivision (a) and shall post the form and translations on its Internet Web site. The State Bar shall translate the form into the following languages: Spanish, Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, Korean, Armenian, Persian, Japanese, Russian, Hindi, Arabic, French, Punjabi, Portuguese, Mon-Khmer, Hmong, Thai, Gujarati. The State
 Bar, upon request, may translate the forms into other languages.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an attorney providing immigration reform act services who meets the criteria of subdivision (b) of Section 6241 shall be responsible for adding and translating the name of, toll-free telephone number of, and information on the Internet Web site for, the bar of the court of any state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States or the District of Columbia in which he or she is admitted to practice law.

(c) Failure to comply with any provision of this section renders the contract voidable at the option of the client, and the attorney shall, upon the contract being voided, be entitled to collect a reasonable fee.

(d) This section shall become operative when the State Bar posts on its Internet Web site the
 form and translations required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). The State Bar shall post the form and translations as soon as practicable, but no later than 45 days after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 574, Sec. 2.   (AB 1159)   Effective October 5, 2013.   Section operative on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. The California Consumer Legal Funding Act [6250. - 6256.]

6250.

(a) “Charges” means the amount of money to be paid to the consumer legal funding company by or on behalf of the consumer, above the funded amount provided by or on behalf of the company to a California consumer pursuant to this article. Charges include all administrative, origination, underwriting, or other fees, including interest, no matter how denominated. Those charges shall not exceed 36 months from the funding date.

(b) “Consumer” means a natural person who has a pending legal claim and who resides or is domiciled in California.

(c) “Consumer legal funding” means a nonrecourse transaction in
 which a consumer legal funding company purchases and a consumer assigns to the company a contingent right to receive an amount of the potential proceeds of a settlement, judgment, award, or verdict obtained in the consumer’s legal claim.

(d) “Consumer legal funding company” means a person or entity that enters into a consumer legal funding contract with a consumer. A consumer legal company shall not include any of the following:

(1) An immediate family member of the consumer.

(2) A bank, lender, or other special purpose entity that is engaged in either of the following:

(A) Provides financing to a consumer legal funding company.

(B) Receives a security interest or transfer of rights from a consumer legal funding company.

(3) An attorney or accountant who provides services to a consumer.

(e) “Funded amount” means the amount of moneys provided to, or on behalf of, the consumer through a transaction meeting the definition of consumer legal funding.

(f) “Funding date” means the date on which the funded amount is transferred to the consumer by the consumer legal funding company either by personal delivery, wire, automated clearing house, or other electronic means, or mailed by insured, certified, or registered United States mail.

(g) “Immediate family member” means a parent,
 sibling, child by blood, adoption, or marriage, spouse, domestic partner, cohabitant, stepchild, immediate in-law, aunt, uncle, first cousin, grandparent, or grandchild.

(h) “Legal claim” means a bona fide civil claim or cause of action.

(i) “Resolution date” means the date the funded amount, plus the agreed upon charges, are delivered to the consumer legal funding company by the consumer or the consumer’s attorney.

(j) Nothing in this article shall apply to support legal services rendered to an attorney regarding the legal claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   (AB 931)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6251.

(a) (1) All consumer legal funding transactions shall be codified in a written contract.

(2) If the consumer legal funding contract was negotiated in a language other than English, the consumer shall be provided a copy of the contract in both English and the language in which the contract was negotiated.

(b) All contracts codifying a consumer legal funding transaction shall meet the following requirements:

(1) The contract shall be drafted in plain English such that the average consumer can read and understand the terms of the
 contract without having to obtain the assistance of a professional.

(2) All contract terms shall be contained in the agreement when first presented to the consumer.

(3) The contract shall contain a right of rescission allowing the consumer to cancel the contract without penalty or further obligation if, within five business days after the funding date, the consumer returns all funds disbursed by the consumer legal funding company.

(4) The contract requires the consumer to initial receipt of every page of the agreement.

(5) The contract contains a statement that there shall be no fees or charges to be paid by the consumer other than what is disclosed in the
 contract.

(6) The contract contains a statement of the maximum amount the consumer may be obligated to pay under the contract other than in a case of material breach, fraud, or misrepresentation by or on behalf of the consumer.

(7) The contract contains a clear statement of how charges, including any applicable fees, are incurred or accrued.

(c) The contract shall contain a written acknowledgement by an attorney retained by the consumer attesting to the following:

(1) The attorney has reviewed the disclosures specified in Section 6252 with the consumer.

(2) The attorney is being compensated on a
 contingency basis pursuant to a written agreement.

(3) All proceeds of the legal claim will be disbursed through the attorney’s client trust account or a separate settlement fund established to receive the proceeds of the legal claim on behalf of the consumer.

(4) The attorney agrees to disburse funds from the legal claim in accordance with the contract and take any steps necessary to ensure that the terms of the litigation funding contract are fulfilled.

(5) A statement that the attorney has not received a referral fee or other consideration from the consumer legal funding company in connection with the contract and that the attorney will not receive future fees or consideration from the legal funding company.

(d) The absence of the acknowledgement required by subdivision (c) shall render the consumer legal funding transaction and associated contract null and void.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), a contract for a consumer legal funding transaction shall remain valid and enforceable in the event the consumer terminates the attorney who made the attestation required pursuant to subdivision (c).

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, a provision of the contract for a consumer legal funding transaction shall not impose a prepayment penalty on a consumer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   (AB 931)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6252.

(a) All contracts for a consumer legal funding transaction shall disclose material terms to the consumer, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Clear and conspicuous language, on the first page of the contract, detailing all of the following:

(A) The funded amount to be paid to the consumer by the consumer legal funding company upon the completion of litigation.

(B) An itemization of any one-time charges.

(C) The maximum total amount to be assigned by the consumer to
 the consumer litigation funding company, including the funded amount and all charges.

(D) A repayment schedule, including the dates in which all payments are due to the consumer litigation funding company.

(2) A disclosure stating, “Consumer’s right to cancellation: You may cancel this contract without penalty or further obligation within five business days after the funding date if you return to the consumer legal funding company the full amount of the disbursed funds.”

(3) (A) A disclosure stating that the consumer legal funding company shall have no role in deciding whether, when, or for what dollar amount a legal claim may be settled.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the consumer legal funding company may seek updated information about the status of the legal claim.

(b) All contracts for a consumer legal funding transaction shall require the consumer or the consumer’s attorney to notify the consumer legal funding company of the outcome of the legal claim, including, but not limited to, all settlements, verdicts, or other means of dispute resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   (AB 931)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6253.

The contracted amount to be paid to the consumer legal funding company shall be a predetermined amount based upon intervals of time from the funding date through the resolution date, and shall not be determined as a percentage of the recovery from the legal claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   (AB 931)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6254.

(a) A consumer legal funding company shall be prohibited from doing any of the following:

(1) Paying or offering to pay commissions, referral fees, or other forms of consideration to any attorney, law firm, or any of their employees for referring a consumer to the company.

(2) Accepting any commissions, referral fees, rebates, or other forms of consideration from an attorney, law firm, or any of their employees.

(3) Intentionally providing a consumer materially false or misleading information regarding its products or services.

(4) (A) Referring, in furtherance of legal funding, a customer or potential customer to a specific attorney, law firm, or any of their employees.

(B) Nothing in subparagraph (A) shall prevent a consumer legal funding company from referring a consumer to a publicly available attorney referral service operated by a local bar association of the State Bar of California.

(5) Providing funding to a consumer who has previously assigned or sold portions of the consumer’s right to proceeds from the consumer’s legal claim without first making payment to satisfy that assignment if the consumer legal funding company knew or should have known that the consumer had assigned or sold a portion of their rights to
 the proceeds of the consumer’s legal claim.

(6) Receiving any right to, or making, any decisions with respect to the conduct of the underlying legal claim or any settlement or resolution thereof.

(7) Attempting to obtain a waiver of any remedy or right by the consumer, including, but not limited to, the right to trial by jury.

(8) Paying or offering to pay for court costs, filing fees, or attorney’s fees either during or after the resolution of the legal claim, using funds from the consumer legal funding transaction.

(9) Offering consumer legal funding on the condition that a consumer that is represented by counsel terminate that representation and adopt
 counsel recommended by the consumer legal funding company.

(10) Knowingly assisting a lawyer or law firm that is enticing or intends to entice a consumer to bring a claim that the company knows or has reason to know is fabricated or otherwise not brought in good faith.

(b) Any legal funding company that engages in conduct that is prohibited by subdivision (a) shall be liable for all of the following:

(1) Automatic termination of the contract for the consumer legal funding transaction.

(2) Statutory damages not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation or three times the actual damages incurred by the consumer, whichever is greater.

(3) Attorney’s costs and fees.

(4) Injunctive or declaratory relief.

(c) In assessing the amount of statutory damages to be set pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the court shall consider any one or more of the relevant circumstances presented by any of the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, the nature and seriousness of the misconduct, the number of violations, the persistence of the misconduct, the length of time over which the misconduct occurred, the willfulness of the defendant’s misconduct, and the defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   (AB 931)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6255.

The contingent right to receive an amount of the potential proceeds of a legal claim is assignable by a consumer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   (AB 931)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6256.

(a) An attorney, or the attorney’s immediate family, retained by a consumer shall not have a financial interest in a consumer legal funding company offering consumer legal funding, and shall not provide consumer legal funding directly to a consumer.

(b) Any attorney who has referred the consumer to the consumer’s retained attorney shall not have a financial interest in a consumer legal funding company offering consumer legal funding to that consumer.

(c) An attorney retained by a consumer shall not disclose any privileged information to a legal funding company without the written consent of the
 consumer. Disclosing information to a legal funding company at the consumer’s request shall not otherwise void the attorney-client privilege.

(d) An attorney shall not compensate, promise, or give anything of value to a person for the purpose of recommending or securing the services of the attorney or the attorney’s law firm, except that an attorney may do the following:

(1) Pay the reasonable costs of advertisements or communications permitted by Rule 7.2 of the California Rules of Professional Conduct, or any successor rule.

(2) Pay the usual charges of a legal services plan or a qualified attorney referral service operating in accordance with the rules established by the state bar.

(3) Pay for a law practice operating in accordance with Rule 1.17 of the California Rules of Professional Conduct, or any successor rule.

(4) Refer clients to another attorney or a nonlawyer professional pursuant to an arrangement not otherwise prohibited by the California Rules of Professional Conduct or this chapter.

(e) Any attorney who violates this section shall be subject to discipline by the State Bar of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   (AB 931)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Law Libraries [6300. - 6363.]



  ARTICLE 1. Boards of Law Library Trustees [6300. - 6307.]

6300.

There is in each county of this State a board of law library trustees, which governs the law library established for the county under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, a board of law library trustees is constituted as follows:

(1) In a county where there are no more than three judges of the superior court, each of those judges is ex officio a trustee. The judges may at their option select only one of their number to serve as a trustee, and in that event they shall appoint two additional trustees who are residents of the county or members of the State Bar. 

(2) In a county where there are more than three judges of the superior court, the judges of that court shall elect either four or five of their number to serve as trustees.

(3) Any judge of the superior court who is an ex officio or elected member may, at the judge’s option, designate a resident of the county or a member of the State Bar to act for the judge as trustee.

(4) The chair of the board of supervisors is ex officio a trustee, but the board of supervisors at the request of the chair may appoint a member of the State Bar, any other member of the board of supervisors of the county, or a resident of the county to serve as trustee in place of the chair. The appointment of the person selected in place of the chair of the board of supervisors shall expire when a new chair of the board of supervisors is selected, and
 that appointment shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 6302.

(5) The board of supervisors shall appoint as many additional trustees, who are members of the State Bar, as may be necessary to constitute a board of at least six and not more than seven members.

(b) No more than two law library trustees may be residents of the county who are not judges of the county, members of the State Bar, or members of the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 52, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.1.

Notwithstanding Section 6301, in San Diego County the board of law library trustees shall be constituted, as follows:

(a) Up to five judges of the superior court, to be elected by and from the superior court judges of the county. Each superior court judge so elected shall serve a three-year term. In order to maintain overlapping terms, those judges holding office
 as of the date of unification of the municipal and superior courts of San Diego County shall remain in office until the expiration of their original terms.

(b) The board of supervisors shall appoint up to four attorneys resident in the county to the board of law library trustees, to serve overlapping three-year terms. In order to stagger the appointments, the board of supervisors shall, in January of 1997, appoint one attorney to a one-year term, one attorney to a two-year term, and one attorney to a three-year term; and as each term expires, the new appointee shall thereafter serve three-year terms. At least one attorney appointed pursuant to this subdivision shall be a member of the San Diego County Bar Association.

(c) In the event a trustee cannot serve a full term, the appointing authority for that individual shall appoint another qualified person to complete that term.
 Interim appointments may be made by the board of law library trustees in accordance with Section 6305.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.1.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.5.

In any county where there are no more than three judges of the superior court, the board of supervisors, with the concurrence of the majority of the incumbent judges of the superior court, may reduce the number of law library trustees to not less than three members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 52, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.

Appointments of trustees which are to be made by the board of supervisors of the county shall be made at the first meeting of the board of supervisors after the establishment of a law library in the county, the appointees to serve until the first meeting of the board of supervisors in the succeeding January. The board shall, at any such meeting in each succeeding January, appoint such trustees to serve for the term of one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in Los Angeles County appointments made by judges of the superior court shall be for a term of four years, and appointments made by the board of supervisors of the county shall be for a term of two years.

(b) The terms of no more than three judge-appointed members shall expire in the same year.

(c) The term of one member appointed by the board of supervisors shall
 expire each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6303.

The office of trustee is honorary, without salary or other compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

6304.

Each board of law library trustees shall meet quarterly on a day it appoints, and any board may meet at other times as it appoints, at a place to be designated for that purpose. The president of the board may call a special meeting at any time for the transaction of necessary business. A majority of the members constitutes a quorum for business, and an affirmative vote of a majority of the members is required to exercise the powers of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   (AB 170)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6305.

A board of law library trustees may remove any trustee, except an ex officio trustee, who is absent from three consecutive meetings of the board, and may fill all vacancies that from any cause occur in the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.2.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6306.

Each board shall appoint one of its number as president.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

6307.

Each board shall elect a secretary, who shall keep a full statement and account of all property, money, receipts and expenditures, and shall keep a record and full minutes in writing, with the ayes and noes at length, of all proceedings of the board.

Under the secretary’s hand, the proceedings may be verified by an official seal adopted and provided by the board for that
 purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.3.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Law Library Funds [6320. - 6326.]

6320.

All money collected for the law library in each county, must be deposited with the treasurer of the county, who must keep the same separate and apart in a trust fund or trust account, to be disbursed by the board of law library trustees. Money may be disbursed only as in this chapter provided, and only for the purposes herein authorized.

Whenever a law library and a board of trustees to govern the same, is in existence under the provisions of any law, other than the law superseded by this chapter, in any county, or city and county, in this State, money so collected shall be paid into the hands of those, and in the manner, provided by
 such law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 396.)
-------------------------------------------

6321.

(a) On and after January 1, 2006, as described in Section 68085.1 of the Government Code, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall make monthly distributions from superior court filing fees to the law library fund in each county in the amounts described in this section and Section 6322.1. From each first paper filing fee as provided under Section 70611, 70612, 70613, 70614, or 70670 of the Government
 Code, each first paper or petition filing fee in a probate matter as provided under Section 70650, 70651, 70652, 70653, 70654, 70655, 70656, or 70658 of the Government Code, Section 103470 of the Health and Safety Code, or Section 7660 of the Probate Code, each filing fee for a small claim or limited civil case appeal as provided under Section 116.760 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Section 70621 of the Government Code, and each vehicle forfeiture petition fee as provided under subdivision (e) of Section 14607.6 of the Vehicle Code, that is collected in each of the following counties, the amount indicated in this subdivision shall be paid to the law library fund in that county: JurisdictionAmountAlameda $37.00Alpine 4.00Amador 20.00Butte 35.00Calaveras 32.00Colusa 17.00Contra Costa 35.00Del Norte
 20.00El Dorado 29.00Fresno 37.00Glenn 20.00Humboldt 40.00Imperial 20.00Inyo 29.00Kern 27.00Kings
 29.00Lake 23.00Lassen 28.00Los Angeles 24.00Madera 32.00Marin 32.00Mariposa 27.00Mendocino 35.00Merced 29.00Modoc 20.00Mono 20.00Monterey 31.00Napa 23.00Nevada 29.00Orange 35.00Placer 35.00Plumas
 23.00Riverside 32.00Sacramento 50.00San Benito 26.00San Bernardino 29.00San Diego 38.00San Francisco 42.00San Joaquin 29.00San Luis Obispo 34.00San Mateo 38.50Santa Barbara 41.00Santa Clara 26.00Santa Cruz 35.00Shasta 26.00Sierra 20.00Siskiyou 26.00Solano 29.00Sonoma 35.00Stanislaus 24.00Sutter 7.00Tehama 23.00Trinity 20.00Tulare 35.00Tuolumne 20.00Ventura
 32.00Yolo 35.00Yuba 10.00(b) If a board of supervisors in any county acted before January 1, 2006, to increase the law library fee in that county effective January 1, 2006, the amount distributed to the law library fund in that county under subdivision (a) shall be increased by the amount that the board of supervisors acted to increase the fee, up to three dollars ($3). Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 6322.1, as it read on January 1, 2005, the maximum increase permitted under this subdivision in Los Angeles County is three dollars ($3), rather than two dollars ($2).

(c) The amounts of twenty-three dollars ($23) for Inyo County, twenty-nine dollars ($29) for Mendocino County, twenty-three dollars ($23) for Plumas County, and twenty-three dollars ($23) for San Benito County listed in subdivision (a) shall apply to distributions made under subdivision (a) beginning January 1, 2006.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.4.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6322.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the change in the method of distributing funds to law libraries from fees collected by the superior courts under the Uniform Civil Fees and Standard Fee Schedule Act of 2005 will not result in undue financial hardship for any law library. On and after January 1, 2006, any law library that experiences undue financial hardship from the change in the method of distributing funding to law libraries may request a one-time advance from the Administrative Office of the Courts. The
 Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide the advance within 15 days after the request is received, but no earlier than February 1, 2006, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The law library board of trustees certifies that the law library is experiencing financial hardship caused by an increase in the time between collection of a fee by the court and the receipt of the money by the law library fund resulting from the implementation of the new distribution method for money received from superior court filing fees.

(2) The law library board of trustees certifies that the law library is operating under this chapter.

(3) The Administrative Office of the Courts receives the request on or before February 15, 2006.

(b) The amount of the
 advance shall be equal to one-twelfth of the law library’s total receipts from superior court fees for the 2003-04 fiscal year.
